Utah statutes.
58-16a-902.   Policy.

It is the policy of the state that citizens who wear contact lenses pursuant to valid prescriptions should not be unreasonably denied the opportunity to purchase their contact lenses from their retailer of choice.



Enacted by Chapter 245, 2006 General Session

